Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-2122.01
Continuing education in domestic abuse counseling; requirements.

(1) Every two years, a minimum of two hours of continuing education in domestic abuse counseling shall be required for all licensed mental health practitioners and licensed independent mental health practitioners under the Mental Health Practice Act.

(2) Such training shall be conducted by an individual who has (a) received the domestic abuse training required in section 38-2123, (b) a minimum of three years' experience working with victims of domestic abuse or offenders, and (c) completed an additional forty hours in domestic abuse-related training.

(3) For purposes of the section, domestic abuse means abuse as defined in section 42-903.

Laws 2026, LB912, § 14.
January 1, 2027